Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.101

Requirements of tallying systems for approval.

The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system unless it:

(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of votes have been marked for any office or issue;

(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts the properly voted portions of the ballot;

(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;

(4) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and

(5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has been tested and certified by an independent testing authority designated by the United States election assistance commission.

[ 2006 c 207 s 3; 2004 c 271 s 109.]